Illinois, session 104th, HB20.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 25-8 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/25-8)  (from Ch. 46, par. 25-8)7    Sec. 25-8. (a) When a vacancy shall occur in the office of 8United States Senator from this state, the Governor shall make 9temporary appointment to fill such vacancy until the next 10election of representatives in Congress, at which time such 11vacancy shall be filled by election, and the senator so 12elected shall take office as soon thereafter as he shall 13receive his certificate of election.14    (b) Any person appointed to fill a vacancy under this 15Section shall be affiliated with the same political party as 16the person vacating the office if the person vacating the 17office was elected as a member of an established political 18party, as defined by Section 10-2, that is still in existence 19at the time of appointment. The appointee shall establish his 20or her political party affiliation by his or her record of 21voting in party primary elections or by holding or having held 22an office in a political party organization before 23appointment.   HB0020- 2 -LRB104 03142 BDA 13163 b1(Source: Laws 1943, vol. 2, p. 1.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.